Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 22. The Hampton Roads Museum Consortium.

§ 22.1-356.
The Hampton Roads Museum Consortium created; region defined; governing board.

The Hampton Roads Museum Consortium is hereby established and shall hereinafter be referred to as the Consortium. For the purposes of this chapter and the work of the Consortium, “Hampton Roads” shall include the jurisdictions located within the boundaries of Planning District 23, including the Counties of Gloucester, Isle of Wight, James City, Southampton, and York; and the Cities of Chesapeake, Franklin, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk, Poquoson, Portsmouth, Suffolk, Virginia Beach, and Williamsburg. The Consortium may consist of any or all accredited museums located within Hampton Roads that are not state agencies. Other museums and cultural facilities located in Hampton Roads may join the Consortium upon the approval of the governing board. The governing board of the Consortium shall consist of the chief executive officer of each of the member museums. The region’s legislators may serve as nonvoting, advisory members to assist in the performance of the Consortium’s duties.

No board members shall receive compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members and may provide such rules as it considers appropriate concerning its membership, quorum, and establishment of committees.

History.

2001, c. 472.

§ 22.1-357.
Purpose of the Consortium; functions; authority to apply for and receive gifts and grants.

The Consortium shall serve the school divisions of Hampton Roads in providing training to the teachers, administrators and students in the various Standards of Learning for English, social studies and history, science, and mathematics.

In the fulfillment of its purpose, the Consortium shall perform the following functions:

Coordinate among its members and the school divisions of Hampton Roads the development of joint educational initiatives;

Establish and deliver, in conjunction with the school divisions of Hampton Roads, regional programs to address area education needs, particularly, to assist area schools in meeting the Board of Education Regulations for Accrediting Public Schools in Virginia and to assist area students in achieving passing scores on the Standards of Learning assessments; and

Provide technical assistance to the school divisions of Hampton Roads in achieving full accreditation, including administrator, teacher, and student training.

The Consortium may apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or bequests from public or private sources to enable it to carry out its functions and achieve its purpose.

History.

2001, c. 472.